Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2632
Insurance consultant; contract; department approval; procedure.

If a consultant is required to obtain approval of a contract by the department, such consultant shall complete and mail to the department a copy of the contract, attached to a departmental form, specifying the nature of the work to be performed, the fee arrangement, and an explanation of the necessity for charging a consulting fee. The director may refuse to approve any contract if the potential conflict of interest outweighs any benefit received by the client. If disapproval is not received by the consultant within ten days, the contract shall be considered approved.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 27.